Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-325 Filing of claims. (a)
Proof of all claims shall be filed with the liquidator in the form required by
section 431:15-326 on or before the last day for filing specified in the notice
required under section 431:15-311, except that proof of claims for cash
surrender values or other investment value in life insurance and annuities need
not be filed unless the liquidator expressly so requires.

(b) The liquidator may permit a claimant
making a late filing to share in distributions, whether past or future, as if
the claimant were not late, to the extent that any such payment will not
prejudice the orderly administration of the liquidation, under the following
circumstances:

(1) The existence of the claim was not known to the
claimant and that the claimant filed such claim as promptly as reasonably
possible after learning of it;

(2) A transfer to a creditor was avoided under
section 431:15-315 through section 431:15-317, or was voluntarily surrendered
under section 431:15-318, and that the filing satisfies the conditions of
section 431:15-318; and

(3) The valuation under section 431:15-331, of
security held by a secured creditor shows a deficiency, which is filed within
thirty days after the valuation.

(c) The liquidator shall permit late filing claims
to share in distributions, whether past or future, as if they were not late, if
such claims are claims of a guaranty fund or association, or foreign guaranty
association for reimbursement of covered claims paid or expenses incurred, or
both, subsequent to the last day for filing where such payments were made and
expenses incurred as provided by law.

(d) The liquidator may consider any claim
filed late which is not covered by subsection (b), and permit it to receive
distributions which are subsequently declared on any claims of the same or
lower priority if the payment does not prejudice the orderly administration of
the liquidation. The late filing claimant shall receive, at each distribution,
the same percentage of the amount allowed on the claimant's claim as is then
being paid to claimants of any lower priority. This shall continue until the
claimant's claim has been paid in full.

(e) Claims by guaranty funds or associations,
or foreign guaranty funds or associations shall be filed periodically by the
funds or associations pursuant to rules adopted by the commissioner. These
claims shall share in all subsequently declared distributions as if they were
not late. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next